Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.010

Who may incorporate—Filing fee.

Any ten or more residents of this state who are members of any chartered body or of different chartered bodies of any fraternal order or society who shall desire to incorporate for the purpose of owning real or personal property or both real and personal property for the purpose and for the benefit of such bodies, may make and execute articles of incorporation, which shall be executed in duplicate, and shall be subscribed by each of the persons so associating themselves together: PROVIDED, That no lodge shall be incorporated contrary to the provisions of the laws and regulations of the order or society of which it is a constituent part. Such articles, at the election of the incorporators, may either provide for the issuing of capital stock or for incorporation as a society of corporation without shares of stock. One of such articles shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW, accompanied by a filing fee established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260, and the other of such articles shall be preserved in the records of the corporation.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9117; 1982 c 35 s 166; 1981 c 302 s 12; 1927 c 190 s 1; RRS s 3887-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.